Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1512.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 13-1802, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE13-1802. Theft; classification; definitions A. A person commits theft if, without lawful authority, the person knowingly: 1. Controls property of another with the intent to deprive the other person of such property; or 2. Converts for an unauthorized term or use services or property of another entrusted to the defendant or placed in the defendant's possession for a limited, authorized term or use; or 3. Obtains services or property of another by means of any material misrepresentation with intent to deprive the other person of such property or services; or 4. Comes into control of lost, mislaid or misdelivered property of another under circumstances providing means of inquiry as to the true owner and appropriates such property to the person's own or another's use without reasonable efforts to notify the true owner; or 5. Controls property of another knowing or having reason to know that the property was stolen; or 6. Obtains services known to the defendant to be available only for compensation without paying or an agreement to pay the compensation or diverts another's services to the person's own or another's benefit without authority to do so; or 7. Controls the ferrous metal or nonferrous metal of another with the intent to deprive the other person of the metal; or 8. Controls the ferrous metal or nonferrous metal of another knowing or having reason to know that the metal was stolen; or 9. Purchases within the scope of the ordinary course of business the ferrous metal or nonferrous metal of another person knowing that the metal was stolen. B. A person commits theft if, without lawful authority, the person knowingly takes control, title, use or management of a vulnerable adult's property while acting in a position of trust and confidence and with the intent to deprive the vulnerable adult of the property. Proof that a person took control, title, use or management of a vulnerable adult's property without adequate consideration to the vulnerable adult may give rise to an inference that the person intended to deprive the vulnerable adult of the property. C. It is an affirmative defense to any prosecution under subsection B of this section that either: 1. The property was given as a gift consistent with a pattern of gift giving to the person that existed before the adult became vulnerable. 2. The property was given as a gift consistent with a pattern of gift giving to a class of individuals that existed before the adult became vulnerable. 3. The superior court approved the transaction before the transaction occurred. D. The inferences set forth in section 13-2305 apply to any prosecution under subsection A, paragraph 5 of this section. E. At the conclusion of any grand jury proceeding, hearing or trial, the court shall preserve any trade secret that is admitted in evidence or any portion of a transcript that contains information relating to the trade secret pursuant to section 44-405. F. Subsection B of this section does not apply to an agent who is acting within the scope of the agent's duties as or on behalf of a health care institution that is licensed pursuant to title 36, chapter 4 and that provides services to the vulnerable adult. G. Theft of property or services with a value of twenty-five thousand dollars $25,000 or more is a class 2 felony. Theft of property or services with a value of four thousand dollars $4,000 or more but less than twenty-five thousand dollars $25,000 is a class 3 felony. Theft of property or services with a value of three thousand dollars $3,000 or more but less than four thousand dollars $4,000 is a class 4 felony, except that theft of any vehicle engine or transmission is a class 4 felony regardless of value.  Theft of property or services with a value of two thousand dollars $2,000 or more but less than three thousand dollars $3,000 is a class 5 felony.  Theft of property or services with a value of one thousand dollars $1,000 or more but less than two thousand dollars $2,000 is a class 6 felony.  Theft of any property or services valued at less than one thousand dollars $1,000 is a class 1 misdemeanor, unless the property is taken from the person of another, is a firearm or is an animal taken for the purpose of animal fighting in violation of section 13-2910.01, in which case the theft is a class 6 felony. H. A person who is convicted of a violation of subsection A, paragraph 1 or 3 of this section that involved property with a value of one hundred thousand dollars $100,000 or more is not eligible for suspension of sentence, probation, pardon or release from confinement on any basis except pursuant to section 31-233, subsection A or B until the sentence imposed by the court has been served, the person is eligible for release pursuant to section 41-1604.07 or the sentence is commuted. I. For the purposes of this section, the value of ferrous metal or nonferrous metal includes the amount of any damage to the property of another caused as a result of the theft of the metal. J. In an action for theft of ferrous metal or nonferrous metal: 1. Unless satisfactorily explained or acquired in the ordinary course of business by an automotive recycler that is licensed pursuant to title 28, chapter 10 or by a scrap metal dealer as defined in section 44-1641, proof of possession of scrap metal that was recently stolen may give rise to an inference that the person in possession of the scrap metal was aware of the risk that it had been stolen or in some way participated in its theft. 2. Unless satisfactorily explained or sold in the ordinary course of business by an automotive recycler that is licensed pursuant to title 28, chapter 10 or by a scrap metal dealer as defined in section 44-1641, proof of the sale of stolen scrap metal at a price substantially below its fair market value may give rise to an inference that the person selling the scrap metal was aware of the risk that it had been stolen. K. For the purposes of this section: 1. "Adequate consideration" means the property was given to the person as payment for bona fide goods or services provided by the person and the payment was at a rate that was customary for similar goods or services in the community that the vulnerable adult resided in at the time of the transaction. 2. "Ferrous metal" has the same meaning prescribed in section 44-1641. 3. "Pattern of gift giving" means two or more gifts that are the same or similar in type and monetary value. 4. "Position of trust and confidence" has the same meaning prescribed in section 46-456 means a person who is any of the following: (a) A person who has assumed a duty to provide care to a vulnerable adult. (b) A joint tenant or a tenant in common with a vulnerable adult. (c) A person who is in a fiduciary relationship with a vulnerable adult, including a de facto guardian or de facto conservator. (d) A person who is in a confidential relationship with a vulnerable adult. The issue of whether a confidential relationship exists is an issue of fact to be decided by the court based on the totality of the circumstances. (e) A beneficiary of a vulnerable adult in a governing instrument. (f) A person who has formed a relationship of trust or reliance with a vulnerable adult where the vulnerable adult is likely to rely on that person to act in good faith for the vulnerable adult's interest. 5. "Property" includes all forms of real property and personal property. 6. "Vulnerable adult" has the same meaning prescribed in section 46-451 means an individual who is eighteen years of age or older and who is unable to protect himself from abuse, neglect or exploitation by others because of a physical or mental impairment. Vulnerable adult includes: (a) An incapacitated person as defined in section 14-5101. (b) A person who is sixty-five years of age or older and who meets one or more of the following criteria: (i) Has experienced the death of a spouse, domestic partner or primary caregiver within the preceding twelve months. (ii) Has a medically documented impairment of sight or hearing that significantly limits the person's ability to receive or interpret information accurately. (iii) Is diagnosed with a chronic illness or condition that materially affects cognition, stamina or decision-making capacity, including metabolic disorders, neurodegenerative diseases, malnutrition or sleep deprivation. (iv) Is dependent, in whole or in part, on another person for financial management, transportation, caregiving, access to medications or housing where the dependency creates a substantial risk of undue influence or coercion. (v) Exhibits signs of social, emotional or psychological isolation that materially impair the person's ability to recognize, resist or report financial exploitation. END_STATUTE